Washington statutes.
RCW 38.60.060

Limitation of liability.

(1) No act or omission of any certified public safety telecommunicator or crisis call center staff or designated 988 contact hub staff related to the transfer of calls from the 911 line to the 988 crisis hotline or from the 988 crisis hotline to the 911 line, done or omitted in good faith, within the scope of the certified public safety telecommunicator's employment responsibilities with the public safety answering point and the crisis call center or designated 988 contact hub and in accordance with call system transfer protocols adopted by both the department of health and the emergency management division shall impose liability upon:

(a) The certified public safety telecommunicator or the certified public safety telecommunicator's supervisor;

(b) The public safety answering point or its officers, staff, or employees;

(c) The clinical staff of the crisis call center or designated 988 contact hub or their clinical supervisors;

(d) The crisis call center or designated 988 contact hub or its officers, staff, or employees; or

(e) Any member of a mobile rapid response crisis team or community-based crisis team endorsed under RCW 71.24.903.

(2) This section shall not apply to any act or omission which constitutes either gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

[ 2023 c 454 s 14.]